District of Columbia statutes.
22-1323

Obstructing bridges connecting D.C. and Virginia.

Effective with respect to conduct occurring on or after August 5, 1997, whoever in the District of Columbia knowingly and willfully obstructs any bridge connecting the District of Columbia and the Commonwealth of Virginia:

(1)

Shall be fined not less than $1,000 and not more than $5,000, and in addition may be imprisoned not more than 30 days; or

(2)

If applicable, shall be subject to prosecution by the District of Columbia under the provisions of District law and regulation amended by the Safe Streets Anti-Prostitution Amendment Act of 1996.

(3)

The fine set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 782, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11712(e)
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 112(b), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-133.17.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1123.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (3).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 112(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Effective Dates

Section 11721 of title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 786, the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, provided that except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.

References in Text

The “regulation amended by the Safe Streets Anti-Prostitution Amendment Act of 1996,” referred to in (2), is § 5 of D.C. Law 11-130, effective May 24, 1996, and found at 43 DCR 1570.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.